pt-PT: Cor da areia: Bege; Preto; Azul; Transparente; Brilha no escuro; Ouro; Verde; Multicor; Laranja; Rosa; Roxo; Vermelho; Prata; Turquesa; Amarelo; Outro
ja: 砂の色: ベージュ; ブラック; ブルー; クリア; 暗闇で光る; ゴールド; グリーン; マルチカラー; オレンジ; ピンク; パープル; レッド; シルバー; ターコイズ; イエロー; その他
lt-LT: Smėlio spalva: Smėlio; Juodas; Mėlynas; Skaidrus; Švytintis tamsoje; Aukso; Žalias; Daugiaspalvis; Oranžinis; Rožinis; Violetinis; Raudonas; Sidabrinis; Turkio; Geltonas; Kita
nb: Sandfarge: Beige; Sort; Blå; Gjennomsiktig; Lyser i mørket; Gull; Grønn; Flerfarget; Oransje; Rosa; Lilla; Rød; Sølv; Turkis; Gul; Annet
sk-SK: Piesková farba: Béžový; Čierny; Modrý; Priehľadný; Svietiaci v tme; Zlatý; Zelený; Viacfarebný; Oranžový; Ružový; Fialový; Červený; Strieborný; Tyrkysový; Žltý; Iné
it: Colore della sabbia: Beige; Nero; Blu; Trasparente; Fosforescente; Oro; Verde; Multicolore; Arancione; Rosa; Viola; Rosso; Argento; Turchese; Giallo; Altro
ru: Цвет песка: Бежевый; Черный; Синий; Прозрачный; Светится в темноте; Золотистый; Зеленый; Разноцветный; Оранжевый; Розовый; Фиолетовый; Красный; Серебристый; Бирюзовый; Желтый; Другой
el: Χρώμα άμμου: Μπεζ; Μαύρο; Μπλε; Διάφανο; Φωσφορίζον; Χρυσό; Πράσινο; Πολυχρωμία; Πορτοκαλί; Ροζ; Μωβ; Κόκκινο; Ασημί; Τιρκουάζ; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
fr: Couleur du sable: Beige; Noir; Bleu; Clair; Brille dans le noir; Or; Vert; Multicolore; Orange; Rose; Violet; Rouge; Argent; Turquoise; Jaune; Autre
en: Sand color: Beige; Black; Blue; Clear; Glow in the dark; Gold; Green; Multicolor; Orange; Pink; Purple; Red; Silver; Turquoise; Yellow; Other
pl: Kolor piasku: Beżowe; Czarne; Niebieskie; Przezroczyste; Świecące w ciemności; Złote; Zielone; Wielokolorowe; Pomarańczowe; Różowe; Fioletowe; Czerwone; Srebrne; Turkusowe; Żółte; Inne
tr: Kum rengi: Bej; Siyah; Mavi; Şeffaf; Karanlıkta parlayan; Altın; Yeşil; Çok renkli; Turuncu; Pembe; Mor; Kırmızı; Gümüş; Turkuaz; Sarı; Diğer
pt-BR: Cor da areia: Bege; Preto; Azul; Transparente; Brilha no escuro; Gold; Verde; Multicolorido; Laranja; Rosa; Roxo; Vermelho; Silver; Turquesa; Amarela; Outro
ro-RO: Culoarea nisipului: Bej; Negru; Albastru; Transparent; Fosforescent; Auriu; Verde; Multicolor; Portocaliu; Roz; Purpuriu; Roșu; Argintiu; Turcoaz; Galben; Altele
es: Color de la arena: Beige; Negro; Azul; Clara; Brilla en la oscuridad; Dorado; Verde; Multicolor; Naranja; Rosa; Morado; Rojo; Plateado; Turquesa; Amarillo; Otros
bg-BG: Цвят на пясъка: Бежово; Черно; Синьо; Прозрачно; Светещо в тъмното; Злато; Зелено; Многоцветно; Оранжево; Розово; Лилаво; Червено; Сребърно; Тюркоаз; Жълто; Друго
da: Sandfarvet: Beige; Sort; Blå; Klar; Selvlysende; Guld; Grøn; Flerfarvet; Orange; Pink; Lilla; Rød; Sølv; Turkis; Gul; Andet
vi: Màu cát: Màu be; Màu đen; Màu xanh dương; Trong suốt; Dạ quang; Vàng; Màu xanh lá cây; Nhiều màu; Cam; Màu hồng; Màu tím; Màu đỏ; Màu bạc; Ngọc lam; Màu vàng; Khác
nl: Zandkleur: Beige; Zwart; Blauw; Transparant; Glow-in-the-dark; Goud; Groen; Meerkleurig; Oranje; Roze; Paars; Rood; Zilver; Turkoois; Geel; Overig
fi: Hiekan väri: Beige; Musta; Sininen; Läpinäkyvä; Pimeässä loistava; Kulta; Vihreä; Monivärinen; Oranssi; Vaaleanpunainen; Violetti; Punainen; Hopea; Turkoosi; Keltainen; Muu
sl-SI: Barva peska: Bež; Črna; Modra; Prozorna; Sveti v temi; Zlato; Zeleno; Večbarvni; Oranžna; Rožnat; Vijolični; Rdeče; Srebro; Turkiz; Rumen; Druga
hr-HR: Boja pijeska: Bež; Crna; Plavo; Prozirno; Svijetli u mraku; Zlatno; Zelena; Višebojno; Narančasto; Ružičasta; Ljubičasta; Crveno; Srebrno; Tirkiz; Žuti; Ostalo
ko: 모래 색상: 베이지; 블랙; 블루; 투명; 형광; 금색; 녹색; 여러 색; 주황색; 분홍색; 보라색; 레드; 은색; 터키석; 옐로우; 기타
sv: Sandfärg: Beige; Svart; Blå; Genomskinlig; Lyser i mörkret; Gyllene; Grön; Flerfärgad; Orange; Rosa; Lila; Rött; Silver; Turkos; Gul; Annat
th: สีของทราย: สีเบจ; สีดำ; สีน้ำเงิน; โปร่งใส; เรืองแสงในที่มืด; สีทอง; สีเขียว; หลายสี; สีส้ม; สีชมพู; สีม่วง; สีแดง; สีเงิน; สีเทอร์ควอยซ์; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
cs: Barva písku: Béžová; Černá; Modrá; Světlá; Svítící ve tmě; Zlatá; Zelená; Více barev; Oranžová; Růžová; Purpurová; Červená; Stříbrná; Tyrkysová; Žlutá; Jiné
de: Sandfarbe: Beige; Schwarz; Blau; Transparent; Nachtleuchtend; Gold; Grün; Mehrfarbig; Orange; Rosa; Lila; Rot; Silber; Türkis; Gelb; Sonstiges
hu: Homokszín: Bézs; Fekete; Kék; Átlátszó; Világít a sötétben; Arany; Zöld; Többszínű; Narancssárga; Rózsaszín; Lila; Vörös; Ezüst; Türkiz; Sárga; Egyéb
zh-TW: 沙子顏色: 米色; 黑色; 藍色; 透明; 在黑暗中發光; 金色; 綠色; 多色; 橘色; 粉紅色; 紫色; 紅色; 銀色; 綠松色; 黃色; 其他
zh-CN: 沙子颜色: 茶色; 黑色; 蓝色; 透明; 夜光; 金色; 绿色; 多色; 橙色; 粉红色; 紫色; 红色; 银色; 蓝绿色; 黄色; 其他